Massachusetts, session 194th, S2210.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7 of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 168, after the words “chapter 32” the
following words:- , or by the general court, or by the office of the governor of the
commonwealth.
SECTION 2. Said section 7 of chapter 4, as so appearing, is hereby further amended in
paragraph twenty-sixth by inserting the following new subparagraphs:
(v) communications between a member of the general court, or such member’s employee,
agent, or representative, and any constituent of such member; provided, however, that the
communications reasonably relate to a constituent’s request for assistance in obtaining
of 3

government-provided benefits or services or otherwise interacting with a state or federal agency;
or
(w) communications, memoranda, drafts or other documents relating to developing policy
positions of members of the general court or the governor of the commonwealth.
SECTION 3. Section 1A of chapter 66 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “agencies and municipalities”, in
each instance, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- agencies, municipalities, the
general court, and the governor.
SECTION 4. Said section 1A of chapter 66, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out the words “agency or municipality” in lines 5-6 and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- agency, municipality, the general court, or the governor.
SECTION 5. Section 6A of said chapter 66, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out the words “agency and municipality”, in each instance, and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- agency, municipality, the general court, and the governor.
SECTION 6. Section 10 of said chapter 66, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out the words “agency or municipality”, in each instance, and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- agency, municipality, the general court, or the governor.
SECTION 7. Said section 10 of chapter 66, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by
striking out the words “agency or municipality”, in each instance, and inserting in place thereof
the following words:- agency, municipality, the general court, or the governor.
of 3

SECTION 8. Said chapter 66, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out section
18 and inserting in place thereof the following section:
Section 18. Declarations, affidavits and other papers filed by claimants in the office of
the secretary of veterans' services, or records kept by him for reference by the officials of his
office, shall not be public records.
SECTION 9. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
of 3